Utah statutes.
58-17b-304.   Qualifications for licensure of pharmacy intern.

An applicant for licensure as a pharmacy intern shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(2)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(3)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character as it relates to the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy;

(4)  complete a criminal background check and be free from criminal convictions as described in Section 58-1-501;

(5)  have no physical or mental condition of a nature which prevents the applicant from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competency, and safety to the public;

(6)  meet the preliminary educational qualifications required by division rule made in collaboration with the board; and

(7)  meet one of the following educational criteria:

(a)  be a current pharmacy student, a resident, or fellow in a program approved by division rule made in collaboration with the board; or

(b)  have graduated from a foreign pharmacy school and received certification of equivalency from a credentialing agency approved by division rule made in collaboration with the board.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2013 General Session

